District of Columbia statutes.
44-105.01

Standard of care.

(a)

An ALR must care for its residents in a manner and in an environment that promotes maintenance and enhancement of the residents’ quality of life and independence.

(b)

In order to promote resident independence and aging in place in a residential setting, at a minimum, an ALR shall offer or coordinate for payment 24 hour supervision, assistance with scheduled and unscheduled activities of daily living, and instrumental activities of daily living as needed, as well as provision or coordination of recreational and social activities and health services in a way that promotes optimum dignity and independence for the residents.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 501, 47 DCR 2647